netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_wanAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lqf_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_IR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_s"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqf_A_R"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_23">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_23"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_23_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_23_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_21">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_21"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_21_Re">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_21_Re"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_3233">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_3233"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_213233">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_213233"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_233233">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_233233"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$kq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$kq"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$hq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$hq"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$SQ">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$SQ"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_$swu">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swu"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_$swq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$swq"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_A_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_$kq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$kq"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_$hq">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$hq"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_$SQ">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_$SQ"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_Am">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_Am"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_A">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_i">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_i"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_iy">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iy"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_u">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_u"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_iN"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_U">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lit_A_U"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="banX1"><par n="at_a"/><par n="mr_b_B"/><i>an</i><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="granW1"><par n="at_a"/><i>granW</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="kliS2"><par n="at_a"/><i>kl</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_S_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="grah1"><par n="at_a"/><i>grah</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="mokR1"><par n="at_a"/><i>mokR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="mokR1"><par n="at_a"/><i>mokR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="riv1"><par n="ab_ri"/><i>ri</i><par n="ma_N"/><i>v</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="IkR1"><i>IkR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="jeR1"><par n="ab_ji"/><i>jeR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="syanx1"><par n="ab_sa"/><i>syan</i><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_21"/></e>
    <e lm="syanx1"><par n="ab_sa"/><i>syanx</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_233233"/></e>
    <e lm="kqp1"><par n="ab_ca"/><i>k</i><par n="mr_q_L"/><par n="mr_p_b"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_23"/></e>
    <e lm="kqp1"><par n="ab_ca"/><i>k</i><par n="mr_q_L"/><i>p</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_213233"/></e>
    <e lm="xq1"><par n="ab_xa"/><i>x</i><par n="md_q"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$SQ"/></e>
    <e lm="guh1"><par n="ab_ju"/><par n="mr_g_G"/><i>u</i><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_21_Re"/></e>
    <e lm="guh1"><par n="ab_ju"/><i>guh</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_3233"/></e>
    <e lm="svq1"><par n="ab_sa"/><p><l>sv</l><r>svq</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="sq1"><par n="ab_sa"/><p><l>s</l><r>sq</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$kq"/></e>
    <e lm="Gq1"><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>G</l><r>Gq</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_$hq"/></e>
    <e lm="smi1"><par n="ab_si"/><par n="mr_s_R"/><i>m</i><par n="md_i"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="gA1"><par n="ab_ja"/><i>g</i><par n="md_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A"/></e>
    <e lm="ru1"><par n="ab_ru"/><p><l>r</l><r>ru</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="wrE1"><par n="ab_wa"/><i>wr</i><par n="md_E"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="mU1"><par n="ab_mu"/><p><l>m</l><r>mU</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_U"/></e>
    <e lm="dI1"><par n="ab_di"/><p><l>d</l><r>dI</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="lih1"><par n="ab_li"/><i>lih</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="ku2"><par n="ab_cu"/><p><l>k</l><r>ku</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="i4"><par n="up_aX"/><par n="mr_i_I"/><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="mqj1"><par n="ab_ma"/><i>mqj</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="jAgq1"><par n="ab_ja"/><p><l>jAg</l><r>jAgq</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_$swq"/></e>
    <e lm="cakAs1"><i>cakAs</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="hu1"><par n="ab_ju"/><p><l>h</l><r>hu</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="hrI1"><par n="ab_ji"/><p><l>hr</l><r>hrI</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="Bq2"><par n="ab_bi"/><i>B</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="mA2"><par n="ab_ma"/><i>m</i><par n="md_A"/><i></i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_A"/></e>
    <e lm="hA1"><par n="ab_ja"/><i>h</i><par n="md_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_A_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kiw2"><par n="ab_ci"/><i>kiw</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_i"/></e>
    <e lm="XiR1"><par n="ab_xi"/><i>XiR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi"/></e>
